apertium-kbd.kbd.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Adyghe

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>
%<prn%>

%<tv%>
%<iv%>

%<pers%>
%<dem%>
%<pos%>

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

%<erg%> 
%<abs%>
%<ins%>
%<adv%>

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Pronouns ;
Nouns ;
Adjectives ;
Verbs ; 

Prefixes ; 

LEXICON Prefixes 
! 
! Proprietary ;
! Organic ; 

! Subject ;

Subject ; 

LEXICON Subject

:сэ Valency ; 
:о Valency ; 
:ма Valency ; 
:тэ Valency ; 
:шъо Valency ; 
:ма Valency ; 

LEXICON Valency

! Causative 	гъэ~ [ʁa~] 	"to force, to make" 	гъэ-плъэн [ʁapɬan] ! "to make him look at"
! Comitative 	дэ~ [da~] 	"with" 	д-еплъын [dajpɬən] ! "to look with"
! Benefactive 	фэ~ [fa~] 	"for" 	ф-еплъын [fajpɬən] ! "to look for"
! Malefactive 	шӏо~ [ʃʷʼa~] 	"against one's interest" 	шӏу-еплъын [ʃʷʼajpɬən] ! "to look against his interest"
! Reflexive 	зэ~ [za~] 	"self" 	зэ-плъын [zapɬən] ! "to look at oneself" 

%<caus%>:%>гъэ Verbs ; 
%<coop%>:%>дэ Verbs ; 
%<bene%>:%>фэ Verbs ; 
%<male%>:%>шӏо Verbs ; 
%<refl%>:%>зэ Verbs ; 

LEXICON CASE-ERG

%<erg%>:                     #  ;
%<ins%>:%>кӏэ                # ;

LEXICON CASES 


%<def%>%<abs%>:%>р      # ; 
%<def%>:%>м             CASE-ERG ; 
%<ind%>%<ins%>:%>кӏэ    # ; 
%<ind%>%<adv%>:%>эу     # ; 


LEXICON N-щӏалэ 

%<n%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON N-дэпкъы

%<n%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON PRON-CASE

%<abs%>:         # ; 
%<erg%>:         # ; 
%<ins%>:р%>кӏэ   # ;
%<adv%>:р%>эу    # ; 

LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASE 

%<abs%>:%>р         # ; 
%<erg%>:%>щ         # ; 
%<ins%>:%>щ%>кӏэ   # ;
%<adv%>:р%>эу    # ; 

LEXICON A

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON PRON-SG1

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: PRON-CASE  ; 

LEXICON PRON-SG2

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: PRON-CASE  ; 

LEXICON PRON-PL1

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: PRON-CASE  ; 

LEXICON PRON-PL2

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: PRON-CASE  ; 

LEXICON PRON-DEM

%<prn%>%<dem%>:              PRON-DEM-CASE ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>хэ    PRON-DEM-CASE ; 

LEXICON PRON-POSS

%<prn%>%<pos%>: # ; 

LEXICON TENSE

!Present 	~∅ 	макӏо /maːkʷʼa/ 	(s)he is going; (s)he goes
!Preterite 	~агъэ /~aːʁa/ 	кӏуагъэ /kʷʼaːʁa/ 	(s)he went
!Discontinuous past 	~гъагъ /~ʁaːʁ/ 	кӏогъагъ /kʷʼaʁaːʁ/ 	(s)he went (but not there anymore)
!Pluperfect 	~гъагъ /~ʁaːʁ/ 	кӏогъагъ /kʷʼaʁaːʁ/ 	(s)he went a long time ago"; (s)he had gone"
!Categorical Future 	~н /~n/ 	кӏон /kʷʼan/ 	(s)he will go
!Factual Future 	~щт /~ɕt/ 	кӏощт /kʷʼaɕt/ 	(s)he will go, (s)he is about to go
!Past continuous 	~щтыгъ 	кӏощтыгъ /kʷʼaɕtəʁ/ 	(s)he used to go; (s)he was going
!Conditional perfect 	~щтыгъ 	кӏощтыгъ /kʷʼaɕtəʁ/ 	(s)he was going to go; (s)he would have gone
!Future perfect 	~гъэщт /~ʁaɕt/ 	кӏуагъэщт /kʷʼaːʁaɕt/ 	(s)he will have gone
!Recent past 	~гъакӏ /~ʁaːt͡ʃʼ/ 	кӏогъакӏ /kʷʼaʁaːt͡ʃʼ/ 	(s)he just (recently) went
!Present Perfect 	~гъах /~ʁaːχ/ 	кӏогъах /kʷʼaʁaːx/ 	(s)he already went 

%<past%>:%>ыгъ               # ; 
%<pres%>:                    # ; 

LEXICON NONFIN

%<ger%>:%>н CASES ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: TENSE ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: NONFIN ; 

LEXICON V-TV 

%<v%>%<tv%>: TENSE ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: NONFIN ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Pronouns 

сэ:сэ             PRON-SG1 ; ! "я"
о:о               PRON-SG2 ; ! "ты"
тэ:тэ             PRON-PL1 ; ! "мы"
шъо:шъо           PRON-PL2 ; ! "вы"

мы:мы             PRON-DEM ; ! ""
мо:мо             PRON-DEM ; ! ""
а:а               PRON-DEM ; ! ""

сэсый:сэсый       PRON-POSS ; ! ""
оуий:оуий         PRON-POSS ; ! ""
ий:ий             PRON-POSS ; ! ""
тэтый:тэтый       PRON-POSS ; ! ""
шъошъуй:шъошъуй   PRON-POSS ; ! ""
яй:яй             PRON-POSS ; ! ""


LEXICON Nouns

щӏалэ:щӏалэ N-щӏалэ ; ! "мальчик"
лӏы:лӏы N-щӏалэ ; ! "мальчик"
дэпкъы:дэпкъы N-дэпкъы ; ! ""
мывэ:мывэ N-дэпкъы ; ! ""
пшъашъэ:пшъашъэ N-щӏалэ ; ! ""

профессор:профессор N-щӏалэ ; ! ""

еджапӏэ:еджапӏэ N-дэпкъы ; ! "школа"
щысыгъэ:щысыгъэ N-щӏалэ ; ! ""
тхьэматэ:тхьэматэ N-щӏалэ ; ! ""

LEXICON Adjectives 

дах:дах A ; ! "красивый"

LEXICON Verbs 

! I am forcing you to talk to them again
! у-а-къы-дэ-сэ-гъэ-гущыӏэ-жьы
! you (у) with them (а) from there (къы) together (дэ) I (сэ) am forcing (гъэ) to speak (гущыӏэн) again (жьы)
! obj adv adv coop subj deriv root 
! -6  -5  -4  -3   -2   -1     0    +1

тхы:тхы                 V-TV ; ! "писать"
гущыӏэ:гущыӏэ           V-TV ; ! ""
кӏо:кӏо                 V-IV ; ! "идти"
